Louisiana, session 2026, SB245.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 28:810 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§810. Veteran suicide prevention
A. The legislature finds that a public health approach to preventing
suicide among veterans is of the utmost importance. This approach to
preventing veteran suicide encompasses a wide range of collaborative efforts.
B. The Louisiana Department of Health, office of behavioral health shall
develop a comprehensive plan to prevent veteran suicides, including connecting
veterans to ongoing, barrier-free care and utilizing non-traditional, high-impact
interventions that can rapidly stabilize post-traumatic stress disorder
symptoms.
C. The department shall submit the plan to the legislature no later than
January 1, 2027.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-466 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 245